Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.020

District judges—Number—Changes.

(1) Any increase in the number of full and part-time district judges after January 1, 1992, shall be determined by the county legislative authority of the affected county after receiving a recommendation from the supreme court. The supreme court shall make its recommendations to the county legislative authority based on an objective workload analysis that takes into account available judicial resources and the caseload activity of each court.

(2) The administrator for the courts, under the supervision of the supreme court, may consult with the board of judicial administration and the district and municipal court judges' association in developing the procedures and methods of applying the objective workload analysis.

(3) For each recommended change from the number of full and part-time district judges in any county as of January 1, 1992, the administrator for the courts, under the supervision of the supreme court, shall complete a judicial impact note detailing any local or state cost associated with such recommended change.

(4) If the county legislative authority approves an increase in the base number of district judges in any county as of January 1, 1992, such increase in the base number of district judges and all related costs may be paid for by the county from moneys provided under RCW 82.14.310, and any such costs shall be deemed to be expended for criminal justice purposes as provided in *RCW 82.14.315, and such expenses shall not constitute a supplanting of existing funding.

(5)(a) A county legislative authority that desires to increase the number of full or part-time district judges from the base number on January 1, 1992, must first request the assistance of the supreme court. The administrator for the courts, under the supervision of the supreme court, shall conduct an objective workload analysis and make a recommendation of its findings to the county legislative authority for consideration as provided in this section. Changes in the number of district court judges may only be made by the county legislative authority in a year in which the quadrennial election for district court judges is not held.

(b) The legislative authority of any county may change a part-time district judge position to a full-time position.

[ 2024 c 103 s 2; 2003 c 97 s 2; 2002 c 83 s 1; 1997 c 41 s 3; 1991 c 313 s 2; 1987 c 202 s 112; 1984 c 258 s 8; 1982 c 29 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 14 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 23 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 66 s 7; 1961 c 299 s 11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 82.14.315 expired July 1, 1991.

Effective date—2003 c 97: See note following RCW 3.34.010.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.